Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2363YH (2) 91 ss/ko H.F. 339 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 153.25 Licensed sedation provider 1 host permit. 2 1. The board may issue a licensed sedation provider host 3 permit to a dentist who does all of the following: 4 a. Completes a course approved by the board as described in 5 subsection 3. If the dentist completed the course more than 6 twelve months before the submission of the application, the 7 dentist must also hold a substantially similar permit issued 8 in another state. 9 b. Meets the facility and equipment requirements as 10 determined by the board by rule. 11 c. Receives certification in administering advanced 12 cardiovascular life support from the American heart association 13 or an equivalent certification as determined by the board by 14 rule. 15 d. Submits an application in a form prescribed by the board. 16 2. A dentist who holds a licensed sedation provider host 17 permit may do all of the following: 18 a. Employ a licensed sedation provider to administer 19 moderate sedation on an outpatient basis to a patient who is at 20 least thirteen years of age on whom the dentist is performing a 21 dental procedure. 22 b. Monitor a patient who is at least thirteen years of age 23 who is under moderate sedation. 24 3. a. The board shall only approve a course for licensure 25 as a licensed sedation provider host that provides instruction 26 and an assessment of knowledge and skill in the following 27 areas: 28 (1) Preoperative patient assessment. 29 (2) Emergency scenarios and rescue. 30 (3) Respiratory complication. 31 (4) Patient safety and monitoring. 32 (5) Airway assessment and management. 33 (6) Anesthetic drugs. 34 (7) Recovery. 35 -1- LSB 2363YH (2) 91 ss/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 339 b. A course described in paragraph âaâ shall ensure that 1 a course participant can do all of the following at the 2 conclusion of the course: 3 (1) Identify a high-risk patient. 4 (2) Differentiate between levels of sedation. 5 (3) Monitor a patient receiving moderate sedation. 6 (4) Rescue a patient from a deeper-than-intended level of 7 sedation. 8 c. The board shall review courses for approval on an annual 9 basis and shall only approve a course for which the director 10 of the course has submitted documentation indicating that the 11 course meets the requirements of this subsection. The board 12 may require the director of a course to participate in an 13 interview as part of the approval process. 14 4. For the purposes of this section, âlicensed sedation 15 providerâ means a physician and surgeon or osteopathic physician 16 and surgeon anesthesiologist or a certified registered nurse 17 anesthetist licensed in this state. 18 5. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 19 implement this section, including rules for the expiration and 20 renewal of a licensed sedation provider host permit. 21